Utah statutes.
70A-2-316.   Exclusion or modification of warranties -- Livestock.
(1)  Words or conduct relevant to the creation of an express warranty and
words or conduct tending to negate or limit warranty shall be construed
wherever reasonable as consistent with each other; but subject to the
provisions of this chapter on parol or extrinsic evidence (Section 70A-2-202)
negation or limitation is inoperative to the extent that such construction is
unreasonable.
(2)  Subject to Subsection (3), to exclude or modify the implied warranty of
merchantability or any part of it the language must mention merchantability
and in case of a writing must be conspicuous, and to exclude or modify any
implied warranty of fitness the exclusion must be by a writing and
conspicuous. Language to exclude all implied warranties of fitness is
sufficient if it states, for example, that "There are no warranties which
extend beyond the description on the face hereof."
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)
(a)  unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied warranties are
excluded by expressions like "as is," "with all faults" or other language
which in common understanding calls the buyer's attention to the exclusion of
warranties and makes plain that there is no implied warranty; and
(b)  when the buyer before entering into the contract has examined the goods
or the sample or model as fully as he desired or has refused to examine the
goods there is no implied warranty with regard to defects which an examination
ought in the circumstances to have revealed to him; and
(c)  an implied warranty can also be excluded or modified by course of dealing
or course of performance or usage of trade.
(4)  Remedies for breach of warranty can be limited in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter on liquidation or limitation of damages and on
contractual modification of remedy (Sections 70A-2-718 and 70A-2-719).
(5)  If a contract for the sale of livestock, which may include cattle, hogs,
sheep, and horses, does not contain a written statement as to warranty of
merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose, there shall be no implied
warranty that the livestock are free from disease and sickness at the time of
the sale and the seller shall not be liable for damages arising from the lack
of merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose.
